Utah statutes.
53A-17a-119.   Appropriation for adult education programs.

(1)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education for adult education shall be allocated to local school boards for adult high school completion and adult basic skills programs.

(2)  Each district shall receive its pro rata share of the appropriation for adult high school completion programs based on the number of people listed in the latest official census who are over 18 years of age and who do not have a high school diploma and prior year participation or as approved by board rule.

(3)  On February 1 of each school year, the State Board of Education shall recapture money not used for an adult high school completion program for reallocation to districts that have implemented programs based on need and effort as determined by the board.

(4)  To the extent of money available, school districts shall provide programs to adults who do not have a diploma and who intend to graduate from high school, with particular emphasis on homeless individuals who are seeking literacy and life skills.

(5)  Overruns in adult education in any district may not reduce the value of the weighted pupil unit for this program in another district.

(6)  School districts shall spend money on adult basic skills programs according to standards established by the board.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2010 General Session

